Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB635.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 21, 1989 (P.L.672, No.87), known as the Health Club Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 14.1. Lifeguards.(a) Number of certified lifeguards.--A health club that provides a swimming pool for use by members and guests shall have on duty at least one certified lifeguard for each swimming pool that has a water surface area of 1,500 square feet or larger during hours that the swimming pool is open for general swimming purposes to members or guests of the health club.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following 123456789101112131415161718 words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Certified lifeguard." An individual who has a current certificate in lifeguarding, issued by a lifeguard certifying authority, as recognized by the Department of Health.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0635PN0645 - 2 - 123456